Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1909
Witness from another state; not subject to arrest or civil process while in this state.

If a person comes into this state in obedience to a summons directing him to attend and testify in this state, he shall not while in this state pursuant to such summons be subject to arrest for the service of process, civil or criminal, in connection with matters which arose before his entrance into this state under the summons. If a person passes through this state while going to another state in obedience to a summons to attend and testify in that state or while returning therefrom, he shall not while so passing through this state be subject to arrest or the service of process, civil or criminal, in connection with matters which arose before his entrance into this state under the summons.

Laws 1937, c. 71, § 4, p. 259;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 29-1909;

R.S.1943, § 29-1909.